Wisconsin, session 2025, AB342.
do enact as follows:AB342,15Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 6insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB342,26Section 2. 20.255 (2) (dv) of the statutes is created to read:AB342,2,9720.255 (2) (dv) Grants for school mental health professionals. The amounts in 8the schedule for the grants to school districts under s. 115.369 to hire school mental 9health professionals.AB342,310Section 3. 115.369 of the statutes is created to read:AB342,2,1311115.369 Grants for school mental health professionals. (1) In this 12section, “member of a racial minority group” means an individual who is any of the 13following: AB342,2,1414(a) A Black American.AB342,2,1515(b) An American Indian or Alaskan Native.AB342,2,1616(c) A Hispanic, as defined in s. 16.287 (1) (d).AB342,2,1717(d) An individual of Asian or Pacific Island origin.AB342,2,1818(e) An individual whose ancestry includes 2 or more races.AB342,2,2119(2) The department shall establish and administer a grant program to award 20grants to school districts to hire school mental health professionals who are 21members of a racial minority group.AB342,2,2222(3) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.AB342,423Section 4. Effective date.AB342,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 2publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB342,3,33